Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-821
Authority; purpose.

The purpose of
the authority shall be to assist eligible institutions in the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipment, renovation, financing,
and refinancing of projects and to administer and operate the Nebraska Health
Education Assistance Loan Program as provided in sections 58-857 to 58-862 and the Nebraska Student Loan
Assistance Program as provided in sections 58-863
to 58-865.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 18;

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2918;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1718;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 21.